New York, session 2025-2026, S5281.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (j) of subdivision 3 of section 130.05 of the 2 penal law, as added by section 1 of part JJ of chapter 55 of the laws of 3 2018, is amended and a new paragraph (l) is added to read as follows: 4 (j) detained or otherwise in the custody of a police officer, peace 5 officer, or other law enforcement official and the actor is a police 6 officer, peace officer or other law enforcement official who either: (i) 7 is detaining or maintaining custody of such person; or (ii) knows, or 8 reasonably should know, that at the time of the offense, such person was 9 detained or in custody[.]; or 10 (l) facing pending criminal charges and the actor is a police officer, 11 peace officer or other law enforcement agent who knows or reasonably 12 should know that such person is facing pending charges unless such 13 person is a member of the same family or household as defined in para- 14 graphs (b), (c) and (d) of subdivision one of section 530.11 of the 15 criminal procedure law as such police officer, peace officer or other 16 law enforcement agent. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09898-01-5